trunk/apertium-eu-es/apertium-eu-es.eu-es-adjgender.dix
    <pardef n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC00000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS000</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00D</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00A</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NC0000X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCCS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCFS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMN00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMP00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>NCMS00X</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>noKAT</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[IZE][LIB]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Camp_Davideko_Itunak</l> 
        <r>acuerdos_de_camp_david</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Antilla_Frantsesak</l> 
        <r>antillas_francesas</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Holandarren_Antillak</l> 
        <r>antillas_holandesas</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Gizarte_Larrialdiko_Laguntzak</l> 
        <r>ayudas_de_emergencia_social</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Futbol_zelaiak</l> 
        <r>campos_de_fútbol</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Enpresa_Zientziak</l> 
        <r>ciencias_empresariales</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Herri_Ikastetxeak</l> 
        <r>colegios_públicos</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Langile_Komisioak</l> 
        <r>comisiones_obreras</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Diabetearen_Aholku_Batzordeak</l> 
        <r>consejo_asesor_sobre_diabetes</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Gordailuak_eta_Ponpaketak</l> 
        <r>depósitos_y_bombeos</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Leurtzako_urtegiak</l> 
        <r>embalses_de_leurtza</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Urtegiak_eta_Ur-Hartzeak</l> 
        <r>embalses_y_captaciones</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Haur_eskolak</l> 
        <r>escuelas_infantiles</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Ustiaketa_eta_Sistemak</l> 
        <r>explotación_y_sistemas</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Gainontzekoen_fitxak</l> 
        <r>fichas_de_terceros</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Polizia_judizialen_eginkizunak</l> 
        <r>funciones_de_policía_judicial</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Balkanetako_Gerrak</l> 
        <r>guerras_balcánicas</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>BEZ_eta_Zerga_Bereziak</l> 
        <r>iva_e_impuestos_especiales</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Ulsterren_Askatasunerako_Borrokalariak</l> 
        <r>luchadores_por_la_libertad_de_el_ulster</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Magallanesen_hodeiak</l> 
        <r>nubes_de_magallanes</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Trafikoko_Lurralde_Bulegoak</l> 
        <r>oficinas_territoriales_de_tráfico</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Erakunde_autonomoak</l> 
        <r>organismos_autónomos</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Konponketa_txikiak</l> 
        <r>pequeñas_reparaciones</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Aldizkaria_eta_Argitalpenak</l> 
        <r>periódico_y_publicaciones</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Errusiako_Iraultzak</l> 
        <r>revoluciÃón_rusa</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Europako_1848ko_Iraultzak</l> 
        <r>revoluciones_europeas_de_1848</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>lurraldeetako_organoak</l> 
        <r>órganos_periféricos</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Zerbitzu_elektrikoak</l> 
        <r>servicios_eléctricos</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>Sozietateak_eta_Atxikipenak</l> 
        <r>sociedades_y_retenciones</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="NC_IZE_LIB_mi"/> 
      <p>
        <l><s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</l> 
        <r></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
